Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 10 Vital Records
31-10-14.
Issuance of new certificate of birth following adoption and legitimation or paternity determination.

The state registrar shall establish a new certificate of birth for a person born in this state when the state registrar receives the following:

A report of adoption as provided in Code Section 31-10-13 or a report of adoption prepared and filed in accordance with the laws of another state or foreign country, or a certified copy of the decree of adoption, together with the information necessary to identify the original certificate of birth and to establish a new certificate of birth. A new certificate of birth shall not be established if the court decreeing the adoption directs that a new birth certificate not be issued;

A certified copy of an order of legitimation, annulment of legitimation, or amendment of an order of legitimation as provided in Code Section 31-10-13.1 that requires the establishment of a new certificate of birth;

A certified copy of an order of paternity, annulment of paternity, or amendment of an order of paternity as provided in Code Section 31-10-13.2 that requires the establishment of a new certificate of birth; or

A request that a new certificate be established as prescribed by regulation and such evidence as required by regulation proving that both parents married to each other have acknowledged the paternity of such person and request that the surname be changed to that of the father.

When a new certificate of birth is established pursuant to this Code section for a person born in this state, the date of birth contained on the original certificate shall be shown. The true place of birth shall be shown if the adoptee is the natural child of the spouse of the adoptive parent in the case of step-parent adoptions. The true place of birth shall be shown for all legitimations. For full adoptions, where neither parent is the natural parent of the adoptee, the place of birth shall be, at the election of the adoptive parents, either the true place of birth of the adoptee or the residence of the adoptive parents at the time of the adoptee’s birth. The place of birth indicated must be located in Georgia.

Upon receipt of a report of an amended decree of adoption, the certificate of birth shall be amended as provided by regulation.

Upon receipt of a report or decree of annulment of adoption, the original certificate of birth shall be restored to its place in the files and the new certificate and evidence shall not be subject to inspection except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction or as provided by regulation.

If no certificate of birth is on file for the person for whom a new birth certificate is to be established under this Code section and the date and place of birth have not been determined in the adoption, legitimation, or paternity proceedings, a delayed certificate of birth shall be filed with the state registrar as provided in Code Section 31-10-11 or 31-10-12 before a new certificate of birth is established. The new birth certificate shall be prepared on the delayed birth certificate form.

When a new certificate of birth is established by the state registrar, the original birth certificate shall not be subject to inspection except as provided in this Code section. All copies of the original certificate of birth in the custody of any other custodian of vital records in this state shall be sealed from inspection and forwarded to the state registrar, as the state registrar shall direct.

The new certificate shall be substituted for the original certificate of birth in the files and the original certificate of birth and the evidence of adoption, legitimation, or paternity determination shall not be subject to inspection except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction or as provided by statute.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, § 25; Code 1933, § 88-1714, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 546, § 1; Code 1981, § 31-10-34; Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2410, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 503, § 10; Ga. L. 2004, p. 915, § 3.

Cross references.

Legitimation generally, §

19-7-20

et seq.

Determination of paternity generally, §

19-7-40

et seq.

Amendments of certificates or reports, §

31-10-23

.

31-10-15.
Death certificate; filing; medical certification; forwarding death certificate to decedent’s county of residence; purging voter registration list.

A certificate of death for each death which occurs in this state shall be filed with the local registrar of the county in which the death occurred or the body was found within ten days after the death as follows:

If the place of death is unknown but the dead body is found in this state, the certificate of death shall be completed and filed in accordance with this Code section. The place where the body is found shall be shown as the place of death. If the date of death is unknown, it shall be the date the body was found and the certificate marked as such; or

When death occurs in a moving conveyance in the United States and the body is first removed from the conveyance in this state, the death shall be registered in this state and the place where it is first removed shall be considered the place of death. When a death occurs on a moving conveyance while in international waters or airspace or in a foreign country or its airspace and the body is first removed from the conveyance in this state, the death shall be registered in this state but the certificate shall show the actual place of death insofar as can be determined.

The funeral director or person acting as such who first assumes custody of the dead body shall file the certificate of death within 72 hours. Such director or person shall obtain the personal data from the next of kin or the best qualified person or source available and shall obtain the medical certification from the person responsible therefor.

The medical certification as to the cause and circumstances of death shall be completed, signed, and returned to the funeral director or person acting as such within 72 hours after death by the physician in charge of the patient’s care for the illness or condition which resulted in death, except when inquiry is required by Article 2 of Chapter 16 of Title 45, the “Georgia Death Investigation Act.” In the absence of said physician or with that physician’s approval the certificate may be completed and signed by an associate physician, the chief medical officer of the institution in which death occurred, or the physician who performed an autopsy upon the decedent, provided that such individual has access to the medical history of the case, views the deceased at or after death, and death is due to natural causes. If, 30 days after a death, the physician in charge of the patient’s care for the illness or condition which resulted in death has failed to complete, sign, and return the medical certification as to the cause and circumstances of death to the funeral director or person acting as such, the funeral director or person acting as such shall be authorized to report such physician to the Georgia Composite Medical Board for discipline pursuant to Code Section 43-34-8.

In any area in this state which is in a state of emergency as declared by the Governor due to an influenza pandemic, in addition to any other person authorized by law to complete and sign a death certificate, any registered professional nurse employed by a long-term care facility, advanced practice nurse, physician assistant, registered nurse employed by a home health agency, or nursing supervisor employed by a hospital shall be authorized to complete and sign the death certificate, provided that such person has access to the medical history of the case, such person views the deceased at or after death, the death is due to natural causes, and an inquiry is not required under Article 2 of Chapter 16 of Title 45, the “Georgia Death Investigation Act.” In such a state of emergency, the death certificate shall be filed by the funeral director in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section; or, if the certificate is not completed and signed by an appropriate physician or coroner, the public health director of preparedness shall cause the death certificate to be completed, signed, and filed by some other authorized person within ten days after death.

When death occurs without medical attendance as set forth in subsection (c) of this Code section or when inquiry is required by Article 2 of Chapter 16 of Title 45, the “Georgia Death Investigation Act,” the proper person shall investigate the cause of death and shall complete and sign the medical certification portion of the death certificate within 30 days after being notified of the death.

If the cause of death cannot be determined within 48 hours after death, the medical certification shall be completed as provided by regulation. The attending physician or coroner shall give the funeral director or person acting as such notice of the reason for the delay, and final disposition of the body shall not be made until authorized by the attending physician, coroner, or medical examiner.

When death occurs on or after July 1, 1985, in a county other than the county of the residence of the deceased person, a copy of such person’s death certificate shall be forwarded as soon as practicable by the department to the custodian of records of the county of the residence of such deceased person. The custodian of records shall file such death certificate as a part of the permanent records of such office.

Any other provision of this chapter or Chapter 16 of Title 45 notwithstanding, when the death of a nonresident burn victim occurs in a treatment facility following the transportation of such victim from an incident occurring in another state, only the attending physician shall be required to complete and sign the death certificate.

On or before the tenth day of each month, the state registrar shall furnish to the Secretary of State’s office, in a format prescribed by the Secretary’s office, a list of those persons for whom death certificates have been filed during the preceding month. Such list shall be used by the Secretary of State to notify local registration officers for the purpose of purging the voter registration list of each county.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 157, § 7; Ga. L. 1927, p. 353, § 7; Code 1933, § 88-1214; Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, § 16; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 140, § 8; Code 1933, § 88-1715, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 617, § 1; Code 1981, § 31-10-71; Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 22; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1417, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 1991, p. 669, § 5; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2758, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1201, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 477, § 6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 81, § 1/HB 64; Ga. L. 2010, p. 752, § 1/SB 493; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 31/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 36/HB 540.

Cross references.

Criminal penalty for concealing death of person, §

16-10-31

. “Georgia Death Investigation Act,” §

45-16-20

et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, in paragraph (c)(1), “Georgia Composite Medical Board” was substituted for “Composite State Board of Medical Examiners” and “43-34-38” was substituted for “43-34-37” in the last sentence, and in paragraph (c)(2), “physician assistant” was substituted for “physician’s assistant” in the first sentence.

31-10-16.
Criteria for pronouncing death; immunity from liability.

A person may be pronounced dead by a qualified physician, by a registered professional nurse or nurse practitioner authorized to make a pronouncement of death under Code Section 31-7-16 or 31-7-176.1, by an advanced practice registered nurse authorized to make a pronouncement of death under subsection (o) of Code Section 43-34-25, or by a physician assistant authorized to make a pronouncement of death under Code Section 31-7-16 or 31-7-176.1 or subsection (j) of Code Section 43-34-103, if it is determined that the individual has sustained either (1) irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory function or (2) irreversible cessation of all functions of the entire brain, including the brain stem.

A person who acts in good faith in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be liable for damages in any civil action or subject to prosecution in any criminal proceeding for such act.

The criteria for determining death authorized in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be cumulative to and shall not prohibit the use of other medically recognized criteria for determining death.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1715.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 1629, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1716, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, § 31-10-70; Code 1981, §

31-10-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1392, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 859, § 9/HB 509; Ga. L. 2017, p. 625, § 3/SB 96.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (a), inserted “or nurse practitioner”, inserted “31-7-16 or”, inserted “by an advanced practice registered nurse authorized to make a pronouncement of death under subsection (o) of Code Section 43-34-25,”, and inserted “Code Section 31-7-16 or 31-7-176.1 or”.

Law reviews.

For article, “Baby Doe Cases: Compromise and Moral Dilemma,” see 34 Emory L.J. 545 (1986).

For note, “Incubating for the State: The Precarious Autonomy of Persistently Vegetative and Brain-Dead Pregnant Women,” 22 Ga. L. Rev. 1103 (1988).

31-10-17.
State registration of death certificates; certified copies; certificates of record.

When a death certificate is filed with a local registrar, it shall be transmitted to the State Office of Vital Records for state registration immediately upon receipt. After registration and the assignment of a state file number, an authorized copy of the death certificate shall be returned to the local custodian. Certified copies of such death certificates may then be issued from the authorized copy by the local custodian.

After a death certificate is filed with a local registrar, but before the death certificate has been registered by the State Office of Vital Records, the local custodian shall be authorized to issue copies of the death certificate to be known as a “certificate of record.” Each certificate of record shall have printed thereon the following: “This is an exact copy of the death certificate received for filing in _______________ County.” Such certificate of record shall be signed by the local custodian and have the correct seal affixed thereto.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1715.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 677, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1717, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, § 31-10-72; Code 1981, §

31-10-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 477, § 7.

31-10-18.
Registration of spontaneous fetal deaths.

A report of spontaneous fetal death for each spontaneous fetal death which occurs in this state shall be filed with the local registrar of the county in which the delivery occurred within 72 hours after such delivery in accordance with this Code section unless the place of fetal death is unknown, in which case a fetal death certificate shall be filed in the county in which the dead fetus was found within 72 hours after such occurrence. All induced terminations of pregnancy shall be reported in the manner prescribed in Code Section 31-10-19. Preparation and filing of reports of spontaneous fetal death shall be as follows:

When a dead fetus is delivered in an institution, the person in charge of the institution or that person’s designated representative shall prepare and file the report;

When a dead fetus is delivered outside an institution, the physician in attendance at or immediately after delivery shall prepare and file the report;

When a spontaneous fetal death required to be reported by this Code section occurs without medical attendance at or immediately after the delivery or when inquiry is required by Article 2 of Chapter 16 of Title 45, the “Georgia Death Investigation Act,” the proper investigating official shall investigate the cause of fetal death and shall prepare and file the report within 30 days; and

When a spontaneous fetal death occurs in a moving conveyance and the fetus is first removed from the conveyance in this state or when a dead fetus is found in this state and the place of fetal death is unknown, the fetal death shall be reported in this state. The place where the fetus was first removed from the conveyance or the dead fetus was found shall be considered the place of fetal death.

The medical certification portion of the fetal death report shall be completed and signed within 48 hours after delivery by the physician in attendance at or after delivery except when inquiry or investigation is required by Article 2 of Chapter 16 of Title 45, the “Georgia Death Investigation Act.”

The name of the father shall be entered on the spontaneous fetal death report in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 31-10-9.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, § 17; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 140, § 9; Code 1933, § 88-1716, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1718, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, § 31-10-74; Code 1981, §

31-10-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 31/HB 95.

31-10-19.
Reporting of induced termination of pregnancy.

Each induced termination of pregnancy which occurs in this state, regardless of the length of gestation or weight, shall be reported directly to the department within ten days by the person in charge of the institution or clinic, or designated representative, in which the induced termination of pregnancy was performed. If the induced termination of pregnancy was performed outside an institution or clinic, the attending physician shall prepare and file the report within the time specified by this Code section.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1719, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Performance of abortions after the first trimester of pregnancy and reporting requirements for all abortions, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Public Health, Chapter 290-5-32.

31-10-20.
Permits for disposition, disinterment, and reinterment.

The funeral director or person acting as such or other person who first assumes custody of a dead body or fetus shall obtain a disposition permit for cremation or removal from the state. A disposition permit may be required within the state by local authorities.

Such disposition permit shall be made available by the local registrar of the county where the death or fetal death occurred, or body or fetus was found, 24 hours a day, seven days a week. The registrar will issue a disposition permit immediately upon request from the licensed funeral director or his agent in charge of the body or fetus. The request for a disposition permit may be received by the registrar either orally or in writing. The registrar may respond to the request by any means utilized in the normal course of transacting business including, but not limited to, transmission by facsimile machine.

A disposition permit issued under the law of another state which accompanies a dead body or fetus brought into this state shall be authority for final disposition of the body or fetus in this state.

Prior to final disposition of a dead fetus, irrespective of the duration of pregnancy, the funeral director or person acting as such, the person in charge of the institution, or other person assuming responsibility for final disposition of the fetus shall obtain from the parent(s) authorization for final disposition.

Disposition permits shall not be required where disposition of fetal remains is within the institution of occurrence and a registry of such events is maintained by the institution.

Authorization for disinterment and reinterment shall be required prior to disinterment of a dead body or fetus. Such authorization shall be issued by the local registrar to a licensed funeral director or other person acting as such, upon proper application, in the county in which the dead body or dead fetus was originally interred and a local registrar who issues such authorization shall not be civilly or criminally liable therefor if it is issued in good faith. A permit shall not be required when disinterment and reinterment are in the same cemetery.

The department shall prescribe rules and regulations so that the local registrars may permit hospitals, funeral homes, or others in their respective counties to issue disposition permits.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 353, § 5; Code 1933, § 88-1213; Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, § 27; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 140, § 13; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1130, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1717, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1179, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 677, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-1720, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, § 31-10-75; Code 1981, §

31-10-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 732, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 669, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2758, § 2.

31-10-21.
Record of marriage licenses.

A record of each marriage performed in this state shall be filed with the department and shall be registered if it has been completed and filed in accordance with this Code section.

The official who issues the marriage license shall cause to be prepared the record on the application supplement-marriage report form, including at a minimum the information set out in subsection (b) of Code Section 19-3-33, upon the basis of information obtained from both of the parties to be married.

A person who performs a marriage shall certify the fact of marriage and return the license to the official who issued the license within ten days after the ceremony. The license shall be completed as prescribed by regulations of the department.

Every official issuing marriage licenses shall complete and forward to the department on or before the tenth day of each calendar month an application supplement-marriage report form for each marriage license returned to such official during the preceding calendar month. Such forms may be transmitted in the form of paper or electronically.

The official issuing a marriage license shall keep the original of the application and license for the county records from which the official may issue certified copies but need not retain the prepared application supplement-marriage report forms except to the extent necessary for transmission of such forms to the registrar and confirmation of transmission or receipt.

In addition to the fee provided by Code Section 15-9-60, the official shall be entitled to a filing fee of $1.00 to be paid by the applicant upon application for the marriage license.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, §§ 34, 35; Ga. L. 1952, p. 103, §§ 5, 6; Code 1933, § 88-1719, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 959, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1721, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, § 31-10-50; Code 1981, §

31-10-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1592, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 31.

Cross references.

Issuance of marriage licenses generally, §

19-3-30

et seq.

31-10-22.
Record of divorces, dissolutions, and annulments.

A record of each divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment granted by any court of competent jurisdiction in this state shall be filed by the clerk of the court with the department and shall be registered if it has been completed and filed in accordance with this Code section. The record shall be prepared by the petitioner or the petitioner’s legal representative on a form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar and shall be presented to the clerk of the court with the petition. In all cases, the completed record shall be a prerequisite to the granting of the final decree.

The clerk of the superior court shall complete and forward to the department on or before the tenth day of each calendar month the records of each divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment decree granted during the preceding calendar month.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, § 36; Ga. L. 1952, p. 103, § 8; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 534, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 88-1720, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1722, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, § 31-10-51; Code 1981, §

31-10-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 31.

Cross references.

Annulment of marriage generally, T. 19, C. 4.

Divorce generally, T. 19, C. 5.

31-10-23.
Amendment of certificates or reports.

Unless otherwise specified by law, a certificate or report registered under this chapter may be amended in accordance with this chapter and regulations adopted by the department to protect the integrity and accuracy of vital records. Such regulations shall specify the minimum evidence required for a change in any certificate or report. Amendments to birth certificates, death certificates, and application supplement-marriage reports shall be completed by the department and a copy mailed to the proper local custodian, if any. Amendments to applications for a marriage license or the license shall be completed by the judge of the probate court of the county in which the license was issued. An amendment to divorce reports shall be completed by the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the decree was granted.

A certificate or report that is amended under this Code section shall be marked “amended,” except as otherwise provided in this Code section. The date of amendment and a summary description of the evidence submitted in support of the amendment shall be endorsed on or made a part of the record. The department shall prescribe by regulation the conditions under which additions or minor corrections may be made to certificates or records within one year after the date of the event without the certificate or record being marked “amended.”

Upon receipt of a certified copy of an order to legitimate a child, or an affidavit signed by the natural parents whose marriage had legitimated a child, the director shall register a new birth certificate if paternity was not shown on the original certificate. Such certificate shall not be marked “amended.”

If paternity was shown on the original certificate, the record can be changed only by an order from a court of competent jurisdiction or the Office of State Administrative Hearings to remove the name of the person shown on the certificate as the father and to add the name of the natural father and to show the child as the legitimate child of the person so named. The order must specify the name to be removed and the name to be added.

Upon receipt of a certified copy of an order from a superior court, probate court, or other court of competent jurisdiction changing the name of a person born in this state and upon request of such person or such person’s parents, guardian, temporary guardian, or legal representative, the state registrar shall amend the certificate of birth to show the new name. When the names of the parent or parents and the child are changed, the state registrar may register a new certificate if requested by the parents, guardian, temporary guardian, or legal representative. Such new certificate shall be marked “amended.”

Upon receipt of a certified copy of a court order indicating the sex of an individual born in this state has been changed by surgical procedure and that such individual’s name has been changed, the certificate of birth of such individual shall be amended as prescribed by regulation.

An order from a superior court or probate court shall be required to change the year of birth shown on the original birth certificate by more than one year or to correct any item on a delayed birth certificate, or to remove the name of a father from a birth certificate on file. The person seeking such change, correction, or removal shall institute the proceeding by filing a petition with the appropriate court in the county of residence for an order changing the year of birth, correcting a delayed birth certificate, or removing the name of the father from a birth certificate on file. Such petition shall set forth the reasons therefor and shall be accompanied by all available documentary evidence. The court shall set a date for hearing the petition and shall give the state registrar at least ten days’ notice of said hearing. The state registrar or the authorized representative thereof may appear and testify in the proceeding. If the court from the evidence presented finds that such change, correction, or removal should be made, the judge shall issue an order setting out the change to be made and the date of the court’s action. The clerk of such court shall forward the petition and order to the state registrar not later than the tenth day of the calendar month following the month in which said order was entered. Such order shall be registered by the state registrar and the change so ordered shall be made.

When an applicant does not submit the minimum documentation required in the regulations for amending a vital record or when the state registrar has reasonable cause to question the validity or adequacy of the applicant’s sworn statements or the documentary evidence and if the deficiencies are not corrected, the state registrar shall not amend the vital record and shall advise the applicant of the reason for this action and shall further advise the applicant of the right of judicial appeal.

When a certificate or report is amended under this Code section, the state registrar shall report the amendment to the proper local custodian and their record shall be amended accordingly.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1721, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 715, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 855, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1179, § 4; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1062, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1723, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-12

; Code 1981, §

31-10-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 1991, p. 669, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1592, § 5; Ga. L. 2004, p. 477, § 8; Ga. L. 2004, p. 915, § 4.

Cross references.

Legitimacy proceedings, §

19-7-20

et seq.

Proceedings for determination of paternity of child, §

19-7-40

et seq.

Form of certificate of change of name, §

19-12-3

.

Issuance of new birth certificate, §

31-10-14

.

31-10-24.
Preservation or disposition of vital records; certified reproductions; preserved originals and authorized reproductions as property of department.

The department is responsible for the preservation or disposition of all vital records at state or county offices. To preserve vital records, the state registrar is authorized to prepare typewritten, photographic, electronic, or other reproductions of certificates or reports in the State Office of Vital Records. Such reproductions when certified by the state registrar or the local custodian shall be accepted as the original records for all purposes. The documents from which permanent reproductions have been made and verified may be preserved or disposed of as provided by regulation.

All preserved original or authorized reproductions by the state and local custodians remain the property of the department. Such original or authorized reproductions shall be surrendered to the department when so ordered.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, § 20; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 140, § 10; Code 1933, § 88-1722, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1724, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-11

; Code 1981, §

31-10-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 477, § 11.

31-10-25.
Disclosure of information contained in vital records; transfer of records to State Archives.

To protect the integrity of vital records, to ensure their proper use, and to ensure the efficient and proper administration of the system of vital records, it shall be unlawful for any person to permit inspection of, or to disclose information contained in, vital records or to copy or issue a copy of all or part of any such record except as authorized by this chapter, Code Section 19-7-46.1, and regulation or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction. Regulations adopted under this Code section shall provide for adequate standards of security and confidentiality of vital records. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to court records or indexes of marriage licenses, divorces, and annulments of marriages filed as provided by law.

The department shall authorize by regulation the disclosure of information contained in vital records for research purposes.

Appeals from decisions of custodians of vital records, as designated under authority of Code Section 31-10-6, who refuse to disclose information or to permit inspection or copying of records as prescribed by this Code section and regulations issued under this Code section shall be made to the state registrar whose decisions shall be binding upon such custodians.

Information in vital records indicating that a birth occurred out of wedlock shall not be disclosed except as authorized by this chapter, Code Section 19-7-46.1, and regulation or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

When 125 years have elapsed after the date of birth or 100 years have elapsed after the date of death or application for marriage, or divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment, the records of these events in the custody of the state registrar shall be transferred to the State Archives and such information shall be made available in accordance with regulations which shall provide for the continued safekeeping of the records.

Official copies of records of deaths, applications for marriages and marriage certificates, divorces, dissolutions of marriages, and annulments located in the counties shall remain accessible to the public. While in the temporary custody of the probate court before transmission to the state registrar or confirmation of transmission or receipt, application supplement-marriage report forms shall not be available for public inspection or copying or admissible in any court of law.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, § 24; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 140, § 12; Code 1933, § 88-1723, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 651, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-1725, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-13

; Code 1981, §

31-10-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1592, § 6; Ga. L. 2016, p. 304, § 16/SB 64; Ga. L. 2020, p. 55, § 5/SB 372.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, near the beginning of subsection (e), substituted “125 years” for “100 years” and “100 years” for “75 years”.

Cross references.

Opening of public records to inspection by members of public, §

50-18-70

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 304, § 18/SB 64, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall not be construed to affect a voluntary acknowledgment of legitimation that was valid under the former provisions of Code Section 19-7-21.1, nor any of the rights or responsibilities flowing therefrom, if it was executed on or before June 30, 2016.”